Utah statutes.
31A-8a-206.   Provider agreements -- Record keeping.
(1)  A health discount program operator may not place any restrictions on an
enrollee's access to health care providers such as waiting periods or
notification periods.
(2)  A health discount program operator may not reimburse health care
providers for services rendered to an enrollee, unless the health discount
program operator is a licensed third party administrator.
(3) (a)  A health discount program operator must have a written agreement with
a health care provider who agrees to provide discounts to health discount
program enrollees.
(b)  If the written agreement is with a provider network, the health discount
plan must require the provider network to have written agreements with each of
its health care providers.
(4)  The health discount program operator shall maintain a copy of each active
health care provider agreement.
